Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1802
Crime Victim's Reparations Committee; created; members.

(1) The Crime Victim's Reparations Committee is hereby created. The committee shall consist of five members of the commission and public members to be appointed by the Governor, subject to approval by the Legislature, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) Until successors are appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section, one public member shall represent charitable organizations, one public member shall represent businesses, and one public member, who has training and relevant work experience with victims and survivors of crime, shall represent crime victims.

(b) Five public members shall be appointed within thirty days after September 3, 2025, as follows:

(i) Two public members that represent charitable organizations engaged in providing services to victims, dependents, and relatives of victims. At least one such member shall represent charitable organizations engaged in providing services to victims of sexual assault as defined by section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320, human trafficking as defined by section 28-830, or domestic abuse as defined by section 42-903;

(ii) Two public members that have training and relevant work experience with victims, dependents, and relatives of victims. At least one such member shall have training and relevant work experience with victims of sexual assault as defined by section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320, human trafficking as defined by section 28-830, or domestic abuse as defined by section 42-903; and

(iii) One public member who is a victim.

(3) The members of the committee shall select a chairperson who is a member of the commission.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 88;

Laws 2025, LB499, § 1.